Maine, session 132, LD1163.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13027 is enacted to read:
§13027. Teacher certificate with industrial arts endorsement
A person who meets the eligibility requirements of subsection 2 may apply for an
endorsement on a teacher certificate for a component of industrial arts with experiential,
laboratory-based instruction as described in subsection 1 by filing an application with the
department. The commissioner shall review the application, and if the commissioner
approves the application, the commissioner shall issue the endorsement.
1. Components. The components of industrial arts for which a teacher may obtain an
endorsement on a teacher certificate include, but are not limited to, automotive body repair,
diagnostics and mechanics, welding, electrical, carpentry and computer-aided design.
2. Eligibility. At a minimum, a teacher must meet the following qualifications in order
to be eligible for an endorsement:
A. Completion of an apprenticeship program registered with a statewide or national
apprenticeship and training organization;
B. Completion of a 2-year degree or certificate from a technical institution accredited
by a national association of career and technical schools or similar organization;
C. Completion of a minimum number of hours of paid applied employment or teaching
in the component area for which the endorsement is sought; and
D. Completion of a minimum number of hours of experience learning the trade or craft
in the component area for which the endorsement is sought.
3. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.